Utah statutes.
53A-1-101.   State Board of Education -- Members.

(1)  Members of the State Board of Education shall be nominated and elected as provided in Title 20A, Chapter 14, Nomination and Election of State and Local School Boards.

(2) (a)  In addition to the members designated under Subsection (1), the following members shall serve as nonvoting members of the State Board of Education:

(i)  two members of the State Board of Regents, appointed by the chair of the State Board of Regents;

(ii)  one member of the Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees, appointed by the chair of the board of trustees; and

(iii)  one member of the State Charter School Board, appointed by the chair of the State Charter School Board.

(b)  A nonvoting member shall continue to serve as a member without a set term until the member is replaced by the chair of the State Board of Regents, chair of the Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees, or chair of the State Charter School Board, as applicable.

